District of Columbia statutes.
50-1641.07

Rules; Council review.

(a)

Within 90 days of April 8, 2011, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

All rules promulgated under this subchapter shall be submitted to the Council for review and approval.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-103, § 8, 54 DCR 12213
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-365, § 2(b), 58 DCR 979
D.C. Law 18-365 substituted “Within 90 days of April 8, 2011” for “Within 90 days of February 2, 2008”.
This section is referenced in § 50-1641.07a.